District of Columbia statutes.
31-2009

Supplemental provisions; rules; exemption.

(a)

The provisions of this chapter are supplemental to any other provisions of the laws of the District, and shall not preclude or limit any other powers or duties of the Commissioner under such laws, including, but not limited to, Chapter 13 and Chapter 21 of this title.

(b)

The Commissioner may adopt reasonable rules necessary for the implementation of this chapter.

(c)

The Commissioner may exempt from the application of this chapter any insurer which;

(1)

Writes direct business only in the District;

(2)

Writes direct annual premiums of $1 million or less; and

(3)

Assumes no reinsurance in excess of 5% of direct premium written.

History

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-233, § 10, 44 DCR 765

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-4609.